apertium-esp.esp.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
   <alphabet>aábcdeéfghiíjklmnñoópqrstuúüvwxyzAÁBCDEÉFGHIJKLMNÑOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vblex"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
   <pardef n="gato__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
   
<pardef n="ve/r__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>o</l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>s</l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l></l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>mos</l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ís</l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>n</l><r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	
<pardef n="camin/ar__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>o</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>as</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>a</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>amos</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>aís</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>an</l><r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
   
</pardefs>
   
  

<section id="main" type="standard">

 <e lm="gato"><i>gato</i><par n="gato__n"/></e>
 <e lm="perro"><i>perro</i><par n="gato__n"/></e>
 <e lm="caballo"><i>caballo</i><par n="gato__n"/></e>
 <e lm="vaca"><i>vaca</i><par n="gato__n"/></e>
 <e lm="ver"><i>ve</i><par n="ve/r__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="caminar"><i>camina</i><par n="camin/ar__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="hablar"><i>habla</i><par n="camin/ar__vblex"/></e>

</section>
</dictionary>
